Wyoming, session 2025, HB0088.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-13-101 is created to read:

CHAPTER 13
BUILDING CODES

16-13-101. Single exits.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section and notwithstanding any other law to the
HB0088

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0250
contrary, no state agency, county, city or town shall
require more than one (1) exit to serve six (6) or fewer
stories of a residential group R-2 occupancy. For purposes
of this section, "Residential group R-2 occupancy" means a
residential occupancy containing sleeping units or more
than two (2) dwelling units where the occupants are
primarily permanent in nature including apartment houses,
boarding houses, convents, dormitories and work units.

(b) A county, city or town may adopt an ordinance or
resolution requiring more than one (1) exit to six (6) or
fewer stories of a residential group R-2 occupancy in the
same building provided that the adoption of a uniform code
such as the international building code shall not be deemed
to prohibit one (1) exit unless, in addition to adopting a
uniform code, the ordinance or resolution expressly
requires more than one (1) exit to serve six (6) or fewer
stories of a residential group R-2 occupancy.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0088